Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.525

Treatment of opioid use disorder—Prior authorization.

A health plan offered to employees, school employees, and their covered dependents under this chapter issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2020, shall provide coverage without prior authorization of at least one federal food and drug administration approved product for the treatment of opioid use disorder in the drug classes opioid agonists, opioid antagonists, and opioid partial agonists.

[ 2019 c 314 s 36.]

NOTES:

Declaration—2019 c 314: See note following RCW 18.22.810.